Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1065.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 4301, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 4301. This act shall be known and may be cited as the
"Oklahoma Quality Events Incentive Act" and shall be in effect
through June 30, 2026 2032.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON APPROPRIATIONS AND BUDGET, dated
03/05/2025 - DO PASS, As Coauthored.


HB1065 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.